test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv20_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: ær
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: ær
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: ær
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: ær
    ær+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: ær
    ær+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: óm
    ær+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: áa
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: ærin
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: ærina
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: ærini
    ær+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: ærinnar
    ær+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: ærnar
    ær+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [ónum, ærnum]
    ær+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: áanna
